Maine, session 132, LD1039.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §1252-A is enacted to read:
§1252-A. Class M license
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a Class M license may be issued
to a city, town, county, district or other local unit of government created by or pursuant to
law for the operation of a single motor vehicle or a combination of vehicles that meet the
definition of a Class A or Class B license for the purpose of removing snow or ice from a
roadway by plowing or sanding within the boundaries of that local unit of government. A
Class M license must be held by that local unit of government and must be assigned to only
one individual employed by that local unit of government. There is no limit on the number
of Class M licenses issued to a local unit of government. An individual who is assigned to
operate a single motor vehicle or a combination of vehicles under a Class M license must
pass all required written and road safety tests.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.